Florida, session 2026, HB871.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
38
39 Section 1. Section 474.201, Florida Statutes, is amended
40 to read:
41 474.201 Purpose.—The Legislature finds that the practice
42 of veterinary medicine is potentially dangerous to the public
43 health and safety if conducted by incompetent and unlicensed
44 veterinarians and veterinary technicians practitioners. The
45 legislative purpose in enacting this chapter is to ensure that
46 every veterinarian and licensed veterinary technician practicing
47 in this state meet minimum requirements for safe practice. It is
48 the legislative intent that veterinarians and licensed
49 veterinary technicians who are not normally competent or who
50 otherwise present a danger to the public shall be disciplined or
Page 2 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
51 prohibited from practicing in this state.
52 Section 2. Subsections (6) through (12), (13), and (14) of
53 section 474.202, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections
54 (7) through (13), (15), and (18), respectively, and new
55 subsections (6) and (14) and subsections (16) and (17) are added
56 to that section, to read:
57 474.202 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
58 (6) "Veterinary technician" means a veterinary technician
59 who practices veterinary technology in the state and is licensed
60 under the authority of this chapter.
61 (14) "Veterinary assistant" means a person who practices
62 on a veterinary team providing medical care for animals. The
63 term does not include a licensed veterinary technician.
64 (16) "Veterinary technician" means a person who has
65 graduated with an associate degree from a veterinary technology
66 training program accredited by the American Veterinary Medical
67 Association Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and
68 Activities (CVTEA).
69 (17) "Veterinary technology" means the science and art of
70 providing certain aspects of the medical care and treatment of a
71 patient by a person who is a veterinary technician or veterinary
72 technologist, as delegated and supervised by a licensed
73 veterinarian with an established veterinarian/client/patient
74 relationship. The term does not include the diagnosis,
75 prognosis, prescription of medications, surgery, or development
Page 3 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
76 of treatment plans, which are within the purview of the
77 veterinarian.
78 Section 3. Subsection (3), paragraph (a) of subsection
79 (5), and subsection (7) of section 474.203, Florida Statutes,
80 are amended to read:
81 474.203 Exemptions.—This chapter does not apply to:
82 (3) A student in a school or college of veterinary
83 medicine or a program for veterinary technology while in the
84 performance of duties assigned by her or his instructor or when
85 working as a preceptor under the immediate supervision of a
86 licensee, if such preceptorship is required for graduation from
87 an accredited school or college of veterinary medicine or a
88 program for veterinary technology. The licensed veterinarian is
89 responsible for all acts performed by a preceptor under her or
90 his supervision.
91 (5)(a) Any person, or the person's regular employee,
92 administering to the ills or injuries of her or his own animals,
93 including, but not limited to, castration, spaying, and
94 dehorning of herd animals, unless title is transferred or
95 employment provided for the purpose of circumventing this law.
96 This exemption does not apply to any person licensed as a
97 veterinarian or veterinary technician in another state or
98 foreign jurisdiction and practicing temporarily in this state.
99 However, except as provided in s. 828.30, only a veterinarian or
100 a licensed veterinary technician, as authorized in s.
Page 4 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
101 474.223(1)(m), may immunize or treat an animal for diseases that
102 are communicable to humans and that are of public health
103 significance.
104 (7) Any veterinary aide, nurse, unlicensed veterinary
105 technician, laboratory technician, preceptor, or other employee
106 of a licensed veterinarian who administers medication or who
107 renders auxiliary or supporting assistance under the responsible
108 supervision of a licensed veterinarian, including those tasks
109 identified by rule of the board requiring immediate supervision.
110 However, the licensed veterinarian is responsible for all such
111 acts performed under this subsection by persons under her or his
112 supervision.
113
114 For the purposes of chapters 465 and 893, persons exempt
115 pursuant to subsection (1), subsection (2), or subsection (4)
116 are deemed to be duly licensed practitioners authorized by the
117 laws of this state to prescribe drugs or medicinal supplies.
118 Section 4. Section 474.204, Florida Statutes, is amended
119 to read:
120 474.204 Board of Veterinary Medicine.—
121 (1) To carry out the provisions of this chapter, there is
122 created within the department the Board of Veterinary Medicine
123 consisting of the following seven members, who shall be
124 appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the
125 Senate:.
Page 5 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
126 (a)(2) Five members who are of the board shall be licensed
127 veterinarians.
128 (b) Two members who are licensed veterinary technicians
129 who have been actively engaged in the practice of veterinary
130 technology for at least 5 years immediately preceding their
131 appointment.
132 (c) Two members who are of the board shall be laypersons
133 who are not and have never been veterinarians or members of any
134 closely related profession or occupation.
135 (2)(3) All provisions of chapter 455 relating to
136 activities of regulatory boards shall apply.
137 Section 5. Section 474.2071, Florida Statutes, is created
138 to read:
139 474.2071 Veterinary technician licensure by examination.—
140 (1) A person desiring to become licensed as a veterinary
141 technician shall apply to the board and must meet all of the
142 following requirements:
143 (a) Graduated from a program of veterinary technology
144 accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association
145 Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and Activities.
146 (b) Obtained a passing score on the Veterinary Technician
147 National Exam as determined by the American Association of
148 Veterinary State Boards.
149 (c) Demonstrated knowledge of the laws and rules governing
150 the practice of veterinary technology in this state in a manner
Page 6 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
151 consistent with rules of the board.
152 (2) A credentialed veterinary technician who is in good
153 standing with the Florida Veterinary Technician Association or
154 the Florida Veterinary Medical Association on July 1, 2026, is
155 eligible to apply for licensure upon meeting all of the
156 following criteria:
157 (a) Completed the application form.
158 (b) Demonstrated knowledge of the laws and rules governing
159 the practice of veterinary technology in this state in a manner
160 consistent with rules of the board.
161 Section 6. Subsection (3) of section 474.211, Florida
162 Statutes, is amended to read:
163 474.211 Renewal of license.—
164 (3) The board may by rule prescribe continuing education,
165 not to exceed 30 hours biennially for veterinarians and 15 hours
166 biennially for licensed veterinary technicians, as a condition
167 for renewal of a license or certificate. The criteria for such
168 programs, providers, and courses shall be approved by the board.
169 Section 7. Section 474.213, Florida Statutes, is amended
170 to read:
171 474.213 Prohibitions; penalties.—
172 (1) A No person may not shall:
173 (a) Lead the public to believe that such person is
174 licensed as a veterinarian, or is engaged in the licensed
175 practice of veterinary medicine, without such person holding a
Page 7 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
176 valid, active license pursuant to this chapter;
177 (b) Use the name or title "veterinarian" when the person
178 has not been licensed under pursuant to this chapter;
179 (c) Present as her or his own the license of another;
180 (d) Give false or forged evidence to the board or a member
181 thereof for the purpose of obtaining a license;
182 (e) Use or attempt to use a veterinarian's license which
183 has been suspended or revoked;
184 (f) Knowingly employ unlicensed persons in the practice of
185 veterinary medicine;
186 (g) Knowingly conceal information relative to violations
187 of this chapter;
188 (h) Obtain or attempt to obtain a license to practice
189 veterinary medicine by fraudulent representation;
190 (i) Practice veterinary medicine in this state, unless the
191 person holds a valid, active license to practice veterinary
192 medicine pursuant to this chapter;
193 (j) Sell or offer to sell a diploma conferring a degree
194 from a veterinary school or college, or a license issued
195 pursuant to this chapter, or procure such diploma or license
196 with the intent that it shall be used as evidence of that which
197 the document stands for by a person other than the one upon whom
198 it was conferred or to whom it was granted; or
199 (k) Knowingly operate a veterinary establishment or
200 premises without having a premise permit issued under s.
Page 8 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
201 474.215.
202 (2) A person may not:
203 (a) Lead the public to believe that such person is
204 licensed as a veterinary technician or is engaged in the
205 licensed practice of veterinary technology without such person
206 holding a valid, active license under this chapter; or
207 (b) Use the name or title "licensed veterinary technician"
208 when the person has not been licensed under this chapter.
209 (3)(a)(2) A person who violates subsection (1) any
210 provision of this section commits a felony of the third degree,
211 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
212 (b) A person who violates subsection (2) commits a
213 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
214 775.082 or s. 775.083.
215 Section 8. Section 474.214, Florida Statutes, is amended
216 to read:
217 474.214 Disciplinary proceedings.—
218 (1) The following acts shall constitute grounds for which
219 the disciplinary actions in subsection (3) (2) may be taken:
220 (a) Attempting to procure a license to practice veterinary
221 medicine by bribery, by fraudulent representations, or through
222 an error of the department or the board.
223 (b) Having a license or the authority to practice
224 veterinary medicine revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted
225 against, including the denial of licensure, by the licensing
Page 9 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
226 authority of any jurisdiction, including any agency or
227 subdivision thereof. The licensing authority's acceptance of a
228 veterinarian's relinquishment of a license, stipulation, consent
229 order, or other settlement, offered in response to or in
230 anticipation of the filing of administrative charges against the
231 veterinarian's license or authority to practice, shall be
232 construed as action against the veterinarian's license or
233 authority to practice.
234 (c) Being convicted or found guilty, regardless of
235 adjudication, of a crime in any jurisdiction which directly
236 relates to the practice of veterinary medicine or the ability to
237 practice veterinary medicine. Any crime which demonstrates a
238 lack of regard for animal life relates to the ability to
239 practice veterinary medicine. In addition, crimes relating to
240 the ability to practice veterinary medicine shall include, but
241 not be limited to, crimes involving any violation of state or
242 federal drug laws.
243 (d) Making or filing a report or record which the licensee
244 knows to be false, intentionally or negligently failing to file
245 a report or record required by state or federal law, willfully
246 impeding or obstructing such filing, or inducing another person
247 to impede or obstruct such filing. Such reports or records shall
248 include only those which are signed in the capacity of a
249 licensed veterinarian.
250 (e) Advertising goods or services in a manner which is
Page 10 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
251 fraudulent, false, deceptive, or misleading in form or content.
252 (f) Violating any provision of this chapter or chapter
253 455, a rule of the board or department, or a lawful order of the
254 board or department previously entered in a disciplinary
255 hearing, or failing to comply with a lawfully issued subpoena of
256 the department.
257 (g) Practicing with a revoked, suspended, inactive, or
258 delinquent license.
259 (h) Being unable to practice veterinary medicine with
260 reasonable skill or safety to patients by reason of illness,
261 drunkenness, use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other
262 material or substance or as a result of any mental or physical
263 condition. In enforcing this paragraph, upon a finding by the
264 secretary, the secretary's designee, or the probable cause panel
265 of the board that probable cause exists to believe that the
266 licensee is unable to practice the profession because of the
267 reasons stated in this paragraph, the department shall have the
268 authority to compel a licensee to submit to a mental or physical
269 examination by a physician designated by the department. If the
270 licensee refuses to comply with the department's order, the
271 department may file a petition for enforcement in the circuit
272 court of the circuit in which the licensee resides or does
273 business. The licensee shall not be named or identified by
274 initials in any other public court records or documents and the
275 enforcement proceedings shall be closed to the public. The
Page 11 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
276 department shall be entitled to the summary procedure provided
277 in s. 51.011. A licensee affected under this paragraph shall be
278 afforded an opportunity at reasonable intervals to demonstrate
279 that she or he can resume the competent practice for which she
280 or he is licensed with reasonable skill and safety to patients.
281 Neither the record of proceedings nor the orders entered by the
282 board in any proceedings under this paragraph shall be used
283 against a licensee in any other proceedings.
284 (i) Judicially determined mental incompetency. However, a
285 license suspended for this cause may be reinstated upon legal
286 restoration of the competency of the individual whose license
287 was so suspended.
288 (j) Knowingly maintaining a professional connection or
289 association with any person who is in violation of the
290 provisions of this chapter or the rules of the board or
291 department. However, if the licensee verifies that the person is
292 actively participating in a board-approved program for the
293 treatment of a physical or mental condition, the licensee is
294 required only to report such person to the consultant.
295 (k) Paying or receiving kickbacks, rebates, bonuses, or
296 other remuneration for receiving a patient or client or for
297 referring a patient or client to another provider of veterinary
298 services or goods.
299 (l) Performing or prescribing unnecessary or unauthorized
300 treatment.
Page 12 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
301 (m) Committing fraud in the collection of fees from
302 consumers or any person, agency, or organization paying fees to
303 practitioners.
304 (n) Attempting to restrict competition in the field of
305 veterinary medicine other than for the protection of the public.
306 However, this provision shall not apply to testimony made in
307 good faith at a hearing or other proceeding in which the subject
308 is the revocation of a license or a lesser penalty.
309 (o) Committing fraud, deceit, negligence, incompetency, or
310 misconduct, in or related to the practice of veterinary
311 medicine.
312 (p) Being convicted of Conviction on a charge of cruelty
313 to animals.
314 (q) Permitting or allowing another to use a veterinarian's
315 license for the purpose of treating or offering to treat
316 animals.
317 (r) Being guilty of incompetence or negligence by failing
318 to practice medicine with that level of care, skill, and
319 treatment which is recognized by a reasonably prudent
320 veterinarian as being acceptable under similar conditions and
321 circumstances.
322 (s) Willfully making any misrepresentations in connection
323 with the inspection of food for human consumption.
324 (t) Fraudulently issuing or using any false health
325 certificate, vaccination certificate, test chart, or other blank
Page 13 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
326 form used in the practice of veterinary medicine relating to the
327 presence or absence of animal disease or transporting animals or
328 issuing any false certificate relating to the sale of products
329 of animal origin for human consumption.
330 (u) Committing fraud or being dishonest dishonesty in
331 applying, treating, or reporting on tuberculin, diagnostic, or
332 other biological tests.
333 (v) Failing to keep the equipment and premises of the
334 business establishment in a clean and sanitary condition, having
335 a premises permit suspended or revoked pursuant to s. 474.215,
336 or operating or managing premises that do not comply with
337 requirements established by rule of the board.
338 (w) Practicing veterinary medicine at a location for which
339 a valid premises permit has not been issued when required under
340 s. 474.215.
341 (x) Refusing to permit the department to inspect the
342 business premises of the licensee during regular business hours.
343 (y) Using the privilege of ordering, prescribing, or
344 making available medicinal drugs or drugs as defined in chapter
345 465, or controlled substances as defined in chapter 893, for use
346 other than for the specific treatment of animal patients for
347 which there is a documented veterinarian/client/patient
348 relationship. Pursuant thereto, the veterinarian shall:
349 1. Have sufficient knowledge of the animal to initiate at
350 least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical
Page 14 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
351 condition of the animal, which means that the veterinarian is
352 personally acquainted with the keeping and caring of the animal
353 and has recently seen the animal or has made medically
354 appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal
355 is kept.
356 2. Be available or provide for followup care and treatment
357 in case of adverse reactions or failure of the regimen of
358 therapy.
359 3. Maintain records which document patient visits,
360 diagnosis, treatment, and other relevant information required
361 under this chapter.
362 (z) Providing, prescribing, ordering, or making available
363 for human use medicinal drugs or drugs as defined in chapter
364 465, controlled substances as defined in chapter 893, or any
365 material, chemical, or substance used exclusively for animal
366 treatment.
367 (aa) Failing to report to the department any person the
368 licensee knows to be in violation of this chapter or of the
369 rules of the department or board. However, if the licensee
370 verifies that the person is actively participating in a board-
371 approved program for the treatment of a physical or mental
372 condition, the licensee is required only to report such person
373 to the consultant.
374 (bb) Violating any of the requirements of chapter 499, the
375 Florida Drug and Cosmetic Act; 21 U.S.C. ss. 301-392, the
Page 15 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
376 Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; 21 U.S.C. ss. 821 et seq.,
377 the Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970,
378 more commonly known as the Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention
379 and Control Act; or chapter 893.
380 (cc) Failing to provide adequate radiation safeguards.
381 (dd) Failing to perform any statutory or legal obligation
382 placed upon a licensee.
383 (ee) Failing to keep contemporaneously written medical
384 records as required by rule of the board.
385 (ff) Prescribing or dispensing a legend drug as defined in
386 chapter 499, including any controlled substance, inappropriately
387 or in excessive or inappropriate quantities.
388 (gg) Practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope
389 permitted by law.
390 (hh) Delegating professional responsibilities to a person
391 when the licensee delegating such responsibilities knows or has
392 reason to know that such person is not qualified by training,
393 experience, or licensure to perform them.
394 (ii) Presigning blank prescription forms.
395 (jj) Failing to report to the board within 30 days, in
396 writing, any action set forth in paragraph (b) that has been
397 taken against the practitioner's license to practice veterinary
398 medicine by any jurisdiction, including any agency or
399 subdivision thereof.
400 (kk) Aiding or assisting another person in violating any
Page 16 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
401 provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
402 (ll) Failing to respond within 60 days after receipt of a
403 request to provide satisfactory proof of having participated in
404 approved continuing education programs.
405 (mm) Failing to maintain accurate records or reports as
406 required by this chapter or by federal or state laws or rules
407 pertaining to the storing, labeling, selling, dispensing,
408 prescribing, and administering of controlled substances.
409 (nn) Failing to report a change of address to the board
410 within 60 days thereof.
411 (oo) Failure of the responsible veterinarian to report a
412 change of premises ownership or responsible veterinarian within
413 60 days thereof.
414 (pp) Failing to give the owner of a patient, before
415 dispensing any drug, a written prescription when requested.
416 (2) The following acts constitute grounds for which the
417 disciplinary actions under subsection (3) may be taken against
418 an applicant for licensure as a veterinary technician or a
419 licensed veterinary technician:
420 (a) Violating any provision of this chapter that relates
421 to licensed veterinary technicians.
422 (b) Being convicted or found guilty of, regardless of
423 adjudication, a felony.
424 (c) Being convicted of a charge of cruelty to animals.
425 (d) Soliciting patients from any practitioner of the
Page 17 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
426 healing arts.
427 (e) Willfully or negligently divulging a professional
428 confidence.
429 (f) Habitually or excessively using intoxicants or drugs.
430 (g) Committing fraud, deceit, negligence, incompetency, or
431 misconduct, in or related to the practice of veterinary
432 technology.
433 (h) Committing fraud or misrepresentation in applying for
434 or procuring licensure as a licensed veterinary technician or in
435 applying for or procuring the biannual renewal of such license.
436 (i) Impersonating or attempting to impersonate another
437 person who is licensed as a veterinary technician or allowing a
438 person to use his or her license as a veterinary technician.
439 (j) Practicing with a revoked, a suspended, an inactive,
440 or a delinquent license.
441 (k) Selling or offering to sell a license issued under
442 this chapter or a diploma conferring a degree from a veterinary
443 technology school or college.
444 (l) Aiding and abetting a person in the practice of
445 veterinary medicine who is not licensed by the board.
446 (m) Failing to report to the board within 30 days, in
447 writing, any action that has been taken against the veterinary
448 technician's license to practice veterinary technology by any
449 jurisdiction, including any agency or subdivision thereof.
450 (n) Failing to perform any statutory or legal obligation
Page 18 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
451 placed upon a licensed veterinary technician.
452 (o) Failing to respond within 60 days after receipt of a
453 request to provide satisfactory proof of having participated in
454 approved continuing education courses.
455 (p) Failing to report a change of address to the board
456 within 60 days after such change occurs.
457 (3)(2) When the board finds any applicant, or
458 veterinarian, or licensed veterinary technician guilty of any of
459 the grounds set forth in subsection (1) or subsection (2), as
460 applicable, regardless of whether the violation occurred before
461 prior to licensure, it may enter an order imposing one or more
462 of the following penalties:
463 (a) Denial of certification for examination or licensure.
464 (b) Revocation or suspension of a license.
465 (c) Imposition of an administrative fine not to exceed
466 $5,000 for each count or separate offense.
467 (d) Issuance of a reprimand.
468 (e) Placement of the veterinarian or licensed veterinary
469 technician on probation for a period of time and subject to such
470 conditions as the board may specify, including requiring the
471 veterinarian or licensed veterinary technician to attend
472 continuing education courses or to work under the supervision of
473 another veterinarian.
474 (f) Restricting the authorized scope of practice.
475 (g) Imposition of costs of the investigation and
Page 19 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
476 prosecution.
477 (h) Requiring the veterinarian or licensed veterinary
478 technician to undergo remedial education.
479
480 In determining appropriate action, the board must first consider
481 those sanctions necessary to protect the public. Only after
482 those sanctions have been imposed may the disciplining authority
483 consider and include in its order requirements designed to
484 rehabilitate the veterinarian or licensed veterinary technician.
485 All costs associated with compliance with any order issued under
486 this subsection are the obligation of the veterinarian or
487 licensed veterinary technician.
488 (4)(3) The department shall reissue the license of a
489 disciplined veterinarian or licensed veterinary technician upon
490 certification by the board that the disciplined veterinarian or
491 licensed veterinary technician has complied with all of the
492 terms and conditions set forth in the final order and is capable
493 of competently and safely engaging in the practice of veterinary
494 medicine or veterinary technology, as applicable.
495 Section 9. Section 474.223, Florida Statutes, is created
496 to read:
497 474.223 Licensed veterinary technicians.—
498 (1) A licensed veterinary technician may provide the
499 following services under the supervision of a licensed
500 veterinarian:
Page 20 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
501 (a) Arterial and central venous catheterization.
502 (b) Euthanasia.
503 (c) Intraperitoneal injections.
504 (d) Placement of gastric, nasoesophageal, and nasogastric
505 tubes.
506 (e) Suturing or stapling of skin lacerations, gingival
507 incisions, or existing surgical incisions.
508 (f) Paravertebral blocks and epidurals.
509 (g) A complex single root extraction that is beyond a
510 simple digital extraction of the tooth that requires periosteal
511 elevation but does not require sectioning of the tooth or of the
512 bone.
513 (h) Blood or blood component collection, preparation, and
514 administration for transfusion or blood banking purposes.
515 (i) Ear flushing with powered mechanical devices creating
516 pressure or suction.
517 (j) A thoracocentesis, cystocentesis, or abdominocentesis.
518 (k) Application of casts, splints, and slings for the
519 immobilization of fractures.
520 (l) Placement of an epidural, instraosseuous, or nasal
521 catheter.
522 (m) Administering rabies vaccinations.
523 (2) A supervising veterinarian shall determine the
524 appropriate level of supervision and protocol for any of the
525 tasks under subsection (1). All other tasks may be performed by
Page 21 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
526 licensed or unlicensed persons at the discretion of the
527 supervising veterinarian. In determining the appropriate level
528 of supervision, the veterinarian must consider the level of
529 training and experience of the person to whom the task is
530 delegated.
531 (3) A supervising veterinarian may delegate to a licensed
532 veterinary technician the responsibility of supervising a task
533 or tasks performed by an unlicensed person, except for any of
534 the tasks listed in subsection (1).
535 (4) A licensed veterinary technician may not make or
536 provide any diagnosis or prognosis, perform any surgery, or
537 prescribe any medical drugs as defined in chapter 465 or
538 controlled substances as defined in chapter 893, unless
539 otherwise authorized in this chapter.
540 (5) A veterinary assistant may not identify himself or
541 herself to the public as a veterinary technician or a licensed
542 veterinary technician unless he or she is a graduate of an
543 accredited veterinary technology program or licensed under this
544 chapter, as applicable.
545 Section 10. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsection
546 (3) of section 828.30, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
547 828.30 Rabies vaccination of dogs, cats, and ferrets.—
548 (1)(a) All dogs, cats, and ferrets 4 months of age or
549 older must be vaccinated by a licensed veterinarian, licensed
550 veterinary technician under the supervision of a licensed
Page 22 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 871 2026
551 veterinarian, or a person authorized under paragraph (b) against
552 rabies with a vaccine that is licensed by the United States
553 Department of Agriculture for use in those species.
554 (3) Upon vaccination against rabies, the licensed
555 veterinarian or licensed veterinary technician shall provide the
556 animal's owner and the animal control authority with a rabies
557 vaccination certificate. Each animal control authority and
558 veterinarian or licensed veterinary technician shall use the
559 "Rabies Vaccination Certificate" of the National Association of
560 State Public Health Veterinarians (NASPHV) or an equivalent form
561 approved by the local government that contains all the
562 information required by the NASPHV Rabies Vaccination
563 Certificate. The veterinarian who administers the rabies
564 vaccination or who supervises the administration of the rabies
565 vaccination as provided in paragraph (1)(b) to an animal as
566 authorized under this section may affix his or her signature
567 stamp in lieu of an actual signature.
568 Section 11. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 23 of 23
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb871-00